Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 6 State Police Retirement
24-6-403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Accumulated contribution” means the sum of all amounts deducted from the salaries of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the members' deposit account, together with regular interest credited thereon;

“Actual service” means the service credited to a member under this subchapter. Employment in a position covered by this subchapter shall be credited at the rate of one (1) month for each month of employment;

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal reserve value where “reserve” means the present value of all payments paid on account of any benefit based upon such reasonable rates of interest and tables of experience as a plan shall adopt from time to time;

“Beneficiary” means any person except a retirant who is in receipt of or who is entitled to receive a pension or other benefit payable from funds of the State Police Retirement System;

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System;

“Department” means the Department of Arkansas State Police;

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police;

“Final average compensation” means the average of the highest annual salaries paid a member during any period of forty-eight (48) calendar months of credited service with a public employer.

Should a member have less than forty-eight (48) calendar months of credited service, “final average compensation” means the average of the annual salaries paid to the member during his or her total years of service;

“Member” means any state police officer who is included in the membership of the system as provided in § 24-6-402;

“Pension” means a monthly amount payable from the funds of the system throughout the life of a person.

All pensions shall be paid in equal monthly installments;

“Pension reserve” means the present value of a pension computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables of experience, and regular interest as the board, from time to time, shall adopt;

“Regular interest” means such rates of interest per annum compounded annually as the board, from time to time, shall prescribe;

“Retirant” means any member who retires with a pension payable from funds of the system;

“Retirement” means a member's withdrawal from the employ of the department with a pension payable from the funds of the system;

“Salary” means the compensation paid a member for service rendered as a state police officer.

In no case shall the term “salary” include reimbursement for lodging, meals, or travel expenses;

“Service” means service rendered to the department by a state police officer and shall include previous service, if any, rendered by him or her as an Arkansas state ranger;

“State police officer” means any employee of the Department of Arkansas State Police who holds the rank of state trooper or a higher rank, and it shall include the director.

The term “state police officer” shall not include any civilian employee of the department, nor shall it include any person who is temporarily employed as a state trooper for an emergency.

In any case of doubt as to who is a state police officer, the board shall decide the question; and

“System” means the State Police Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 65.

24-6-404. Eligibility for benefits — Voluntary retirement.

Any member who has acquired five (5) years but less than thirty (30) years of credited service and has attained age sixty-five (65) may retire upon his or her written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

Any member who has acquired thirty (30) or more years of credited service may retire at any age upon his or her written application filed with the board.

For those members with less than thirty (30) credited years of service, the age sixty-five requirement shall be reduced by seventy-five hundredths (0.75) of a month for each credited month of service, but in no event to an age younger than fifty-five (55).

This application shall set forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the member desires to be retired.

Upon the member's retirement, he or she shall receive a pension provided for in § 24-6-406.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 3; 2019, No. 950, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “credited” for “actual” throughout (a).

24-6-405. Eligibility for benefits — Disability retirement.

Upon application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System by a member or by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police on behalf of a member, a member who is in the employ of the Division of Arkansas State Police, who has five (5) or more years of actual service, and who becomes totally and permanently incapacitated for duty in the employ of the division by reason of personal injury or disease may be retired by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, but only after a medical examination of the member.

This examination shall be made by or under the direction of a board of medical professionals as defined in the rules of the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, using the active duty criteria supplied by the division in determining the extent of the disability.

The five-years-of-service requirement contained in this subsection shall not apply to a member whom the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System finds to be in receipt of workers' compensation for his or her disability arising solely and exclusively out of and in the course of his or her employment with the division.

Upon his or her retirement upon account of disability as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a member shall receive a disability pension computed according to the contributory provisions of § 24-6-214 or the noncontributory provisions of § 24-6-227, as applicable.

At least one (1) time each year during the first five (5) years following a member's retirement on account of disability and at least one (1) time in every three-year period thereafter, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System may, and upon the retirant's application shall, require any disability retirant who has not attained age fifty (50) to undergo a medical examination to be made by or under the direction of the medical professionals designated by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

If the retirant refuses to submit to a medical examination in any such period, his or her disability pension may be suspended by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System until his or her withdrawal of his or her refusal.

If his or her refusal continues for one (1) year, all his or her rights in and to a disability pension may be revoked by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

If, upon the medical examination of the retirant, the medical professionals designated by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System report to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System that the retirant is physically capable of performing the duties of the rank held by him or her at the time of his or her retirement, the retirant shall be returned to the employ of the division, and his or her disability pension shall be terminated.

Upon a disability retirant's return to the employ of the division as provided in subsection (c) of this section, his or her service at the time of his or her retirement shall be restored to his or her credit.

He or she shall be given service credit for the period he or she was receiving a disability pension if within that period he or she was in receipt of workers' compensation on account of his or her division employment.

In the event a disability retirant who has not attained age fifty-five (55) performs personal services in an occupation, business, or employment, his or her disability pension shall be reduced so that the sum of his or her disability pension and the compensation received by him or her from the occupation, business, or employment shall not exceed his or her annual rate of salary at the time of his or her retirement.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 4; 2007, No. 404, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6033-6035.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

24-6-406. Benefits generally.

Upon retirement as provided in this subchapter, a member shall receive a straight life pension equal to two and four hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (2.475%) of the member's final average compensation multiplied by the number of years and any fraction of a year of his or her service.

In addition, if a member has service resulting from employment in a position covered at any time by Social Security or another federal retirement plan supported wholly or in part by employer contributions, and if that member's age at retirement is younger than:

Social Security's minimum age for an immediate retirement benefit; and

Age sixty-two (62),

The temporary annuity shall terminate at the end of the calendar month in which the earliest of the following events occurs:

The member's death;

The member's attainment of the Social Security minimum age; or

The member's attainment of age sixty-two (62).

In the event a member with five (5) years or more of actual service in the State Police Retirement System ceases to be employed as a state police officer prior to reaching fifty-five (55) years of age and does not withdraw his or her accumulated employee contributions to the system, the member shall be entitled to receive a pension upon reaching what the member's voluntary retirement age would have been if he or she had continued state police employment from the time of termination of employment.

Any member may elect to withdraw his or her accumulated contributions to the system at the time of terminating employment as a state police officer and to waive any pension rights the member may have earned in the system.

It is considered sound public policy that retirement pay not exceed working pay except for increases after retirement caused by inflation. Accordingly, at the time of retirement, the total of named-plan annuities shall not exceed the member's final average compensation.

No provision of this section shall be applicable to service that is credited at a rate other than one (1) month for each month of employment.

then the member shall receive a temporary annuity equal to five hundred thirteen thousandths percent (0.513%) of the member's final average compensation for each year of his or her actual service.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 5; 2001, No. 151, § 66.

24-6-407. Benefits — Death of retirant.

In the event a retirant who is in receipt of a straight life pension dies before he or she has received in straight life pension payments an aggregate amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her retirement, then the difference between his or her accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of straight life pension payments received by him or her shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

If there is no designated person surviving the retirant, the difference, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Arkansas.

The payments may be made directly to a curator, guardian, administrator, or executor authorized to receive such payments, wherever the representative may be, with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

In no case shall any benefits be paid under this section on account of the death of a retirant if any pensions become payable from funds of the State Police Retirement System on account of his or her death.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.

24-6-408. Benefit provisions — Election of annuity options.

Before the date the first payment of his or her annuity becomes due, but not thereafter, a member may elect to receive his or her annuity as a straight life annuity or he or she may elect to have his or her annuity reduced and nominate a beneficiary in accordance with the provisions of one (1) of the following options:

Option A60 — Sixty (60) Months Certain and Life Annuity.

Under Option A60, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provisions that if the retirant's death occurs before sixty (60) monthly payments have been made, then the full reduced annuity shall continue to be paid for the remainder of the sixty (60) months to such persons and in such shares as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan.

If there is no payee surviving, the lump-sum actuarial equivalent of the remaining monthly payments shall be paid to the estate of the last survivor among the retirant and the designated persons.

The reduced annuity shall be ninety-six percent (96%) of the straight life annuity;

Option A120 — One Hundred Twenty (120) Monthly Certain and Life Annuity.

Under Option A120, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that if the retirant's death occurs before one hundred twenty (120) monthly payments have been made, the full reduced annuity shall continue to be paid for the remainder of the one hundred twenty (120) months to such persons and in such shares as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan.

If there is no payee surviving, the lump-sum actuarial equivalent of the remaining monthly payment shall be paid to the estate of the last survivor among the retirant and the designated persons.

The reduced annuity shall be ninety percent (90%) of the straight life annuity;

Option B50 — Fifty Percent (50%) Survivor Beneficiary Annuity.

Under Option B50, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that, upon his or her death, one-half (½) of the reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the future lifetime of and paid to such person as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan before his or her annuity starting date.

However, that person must be either his or her spouse for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date or another person aged forty (40) or older receiving more than one-half (½) support from the retirant for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date.

The reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty-three percent (83%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by one-half percent (0.5%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age, or which shall be increased by one-half percent (0.5%), up to a maximum of ninety-five percent (95%), for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age;

Option B75 — Seventy-Five Percent (75%) Survivor Beneficiary Annuity.

Under Option B75, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that, upon his or her death, three-quarters (¾) of the reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the future lifetime of and paid to such person as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan before his or her annuity starting date; however, that person must be either his or her spouse for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date or another person aged forty (40) or older receiving more than one-half (½) support from the retirant for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date.

The reduced annuity to the retirant shall be seventy-five percent (75%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by three-quarters percent (0.75%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age, or which shall be increased by three-quarters percent (0.75%), up to a maximum of ninety percent (90%), for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

A death of a spouse or divorce or other marriage dissolution or the death of a person forty (40) years of age or older who is the designated beneficiary under Option B50 or Option B75 following retirement shall cancel, at the written election of the retirant, Option B50 or Option B75 elected at retirement to provide continuing lifetime benefits to the designated person and return the retirant to this straight life or Option A60 or Option A120 annuity, to be effective the month following receipt of his or her election by the State Police Retirement System.

A retirant who is receiving a straight life or Option A60 or Option A120 annuity and who marries after retirement or within one (1) year immediately preceding retirement may elect to cancel his or her straight life or Option A60 or Option A120 annuity and may elect Option B50 or Option B75 providing continuing lifetime benefits to his or her spouse, but only if the election is on a form approved by the system and is received by the system not earlier than one (1) year after the date of the marriage and not later than eighteen (18) months after that date.

The election shall be effective the first day of the month following its receipt.

If a member fails to elect an option, his or her annuity shall be paid to him or her as a straight life annuity.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.

24-6-409. Redetermination of benefits.

Each July 1 the State Police Retirement System shall redetermine the amount of each monthly benefit which has been payable by the system for at least twelve (12) full calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months.

Subject to the maximum stated in subsection (c) of this section, the redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

In no event shall the redetermined amount be more than the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 multiplied by the following fraction:

The numerator shall be the average of the consumer price index for the twelve (12) calendar months in the calendar year immediately preceding July 1, but in no event an amount less than the denominator; and

The denominator shall be the average of the consumer price index for the twelve (12) calendar months in the second calendar year preceding the redetermination date.

As used in this section, “consumer price index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as determined by the United States Department of Labor and in effect January 1, 1987.

However, should the consumer price index be restructured subsequent to 1988 in a manner materially changing its character, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, after receiving the advice of the actuary, shall change the application of the consumer price index so that, as far as is practicable, the 1986 intent of the use of the consumer price index shall be continued.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.

24-6-410. Benefit provisions — Early retirement.

Any member or former member with sufficient years of service to qualify for a vested termination annuity who has not attained his or her voluntary retirement age as provided in § 24-6-404 may retire with an early annuity provided for in subsection (b) of this section upon his or her written application to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing of his or her application, he or she desires to be retired.

The member or former member eligible for a vested termination annuity must have at least five (5) years of actual service and be within ten (10) years of voluntary retirement age.

Upon early retirement, a member shall receive a certain percentage of an annuity for life provided for in § 24-6-406, which percentage shall be one hundred percent (100%) reduced by one-half percent (0.5%) multiplied by the number of months by which his or her age at early retirement is younger than his or her voluntary retirement age, using what his or her voluntary retirement age would have been if he or she had continued state police employment from the time of early retirement.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 6.

24-6-411. Benefit provisions — Death.

If an active member with five (5) or more years of actual service, including service for the year immediately preceding his or her death, dies in employer service before retirement, the applicable benefit provided in this section shall be paid upon written application to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

In the event that a member dies and is not being paid on that date by his or her employer due solely to illness incurred before he or she left the payroll and the death occurs within one (1) year of the last payroll, the member shall be considered, for purposes of this section, to have died as an active member if all other necessary provisions of this section are met.

For purposes of computing benefits provided by this section, the deceased member's salary at the time of death shall be his or her salary for the year immediately preceding the cessation of his or her pay.

If an active member with five (5) or more years of actual service does not have credited service for the year immediately preceding death due to illness which eventually leads to his or her death or due to his or her employer's removing the member from the payroll because of temporary economic conditions of the employer or weather conditions, the active member shall be considered, only for eligibility purposes of the section, to have credited service for the year preceding death.

Benefits shall be paid according to the salary earned during the year preceding death.

The member's surviving spouse who was married to the member for at least six (6) months immediately preceding the member's death shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had retired on the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-6-406, elected the Option B75 survivor annuity provided for in § 24-6-408, and nominated his or her spouse as joint beneficiary.

If the member has satisfied the age and service requirement provided for in § 24-6-404 or had acquired twenty (20) years' actual service, then the spouse annuity shall commence immediately and be payable for his or her life.

If the member had acquired fifteen (15) years' actual service, but had not attained age sixty-five (65), the spouse annuity shall commence at the later of either age fifty (50) or his or her age at his or her death and shall be payable until the earlier of his or her remarriage or death. Otherwise, the spouse annuity shall commence at the later of either age sixty-two (62) or his or her age at his or her death and shall be payable until the earlier of either his or her remarriage or death.

The spouse annuity shall not be less than ten percent (10%) of the deceased member's covered compensation at the time of death.

In any event, as long as the surviving spouse has in his or her care any of the deceased member's dependent children receiving a benefit provided for in this section, there shall be payable to him or her a spouse annuity which shall not be less than ten percent (10%) of the deceased member's compensation at the time of death.

The member's dependent child or dependent children shall each receive an annuity of the greater of either ten percent (10%) of the member's covered compensation at the time of death or an equal share of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) monthly.

If there are three (3) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive as an annuity an equal share of the greater of either twenty-five percent (25%) of the member's covered compensation or one hundred fifty dollars ($150) monthly.

A child shall be a dependent child until his or her death, his or her marriage, or his or her attainment of age eighteen (18), whichever occurs first.

However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended as long as the child continues uninterruptedly being a full-time student at an accredited secondary school, college, or university but in no event beyond his or her attainment of age twenty-three (23).

The age-eighteen maximum shall also be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally incompetent by an Arkansas court of competent jurisdiction or by the board for as long as the incompetency exists.

Upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his or her annuity shall terminate, and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.

If at the time of the member's death there is neither a spouse nor a dependent child, each dependent parent shall receive an allowance of the greater of either ten percent (10%) of the member's covered compensation or an equal share of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) monthly, but only if the board finds that the parent was dependent for at least fifty percent (50%) of his or her financial support upon the member.

If no annuity can become payable to a dependent child due to the death of the member, and a surviving spouse or dependent parents are the only persons who will be eligible for monthly benefits and the spouse or dependent parents are also the designated beneficiaries of the member, then, in that event, the surviving spouse or dependent parent may elect to receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions in lieu of any benefits which could become payable under this subchapter.

The option to choose a refund of the member's contribution shall also be afforded to any spouse or dependent parent qualified under this section whose eligibility for the benefit occurred before the passage of this chapter and who could not exercise that option.

Once the refund of the deceased member's accumulated contributions has been made to the surviving spouse or dependent parents under this subsection, the recipient shall have no future claim to monthly retirement benefits due to the death of the member.

In the event all the annuities provided for in this section payable on account of the death of a member terminate before there has been paid an aggregate amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the member's deposit account at the time of his or her death, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of annuity payments shall be paid to such person as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If there is no designated person surviving a termination, the difference shall be paid to the member's estate.

In the case of a surviving spouse of a deceased member who had benefits terminated due to remarriage under the provisions of this section, the surviving spouse of the member shall be entitled to a reinstatement of benefits upon the death of any subsequent spouse.

The benefits shall cease immediately upon the death or remarriage of the surviving spouse.

If the member is killed while in the official line of duty and the surviving spouse is eligible for a deferred benefit under this section, the surviving spouse may elect to receive a reduced benefit beginning immediately.

The reduction of the benefit otherwise defined in this section shall be:

Five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) per month for each of the first sixty (60) months that the benefit begins before it would have otherwise begun; plus

Twenty-five hundredths of one percent (0.25%) per month for each month more than sixty (60) months that the benefit begins before it would have otherwise begun.

However, the total reduction under this subsection shall not be more than fifty percent (50%).

Those who otherwise would have been eligible for this benefit on or after July 1, 2002, may also elect this reduced benefit prospectively.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 7; 2001, No. 151, § 67; 2003, No. 1735, § 1; 2019, No. 511, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this chapter,” Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 7, provided that the act would become effective: on the date of its approval by the Governor; if the Governor neither approved nor vetoed the bill, on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or if the Governor vetoed the bill and the veto was overidden, on the date the last house overrides the veto. The act was signed by the Governor on April 3, 1997.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “for at least six (6) months” for “at least the one (1) year” in (c)(1).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 511, §
2, provided: “Retroactivity. This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2017”.

24-6-412. Refund of contributions.

In the event a member leaves the employ of the Division of Arkansas State Police prior to the date he or she becomes entitled to retire with a pension payable from the funds of the State Police Retirement System, he or she shall be paid, upon his or her written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the member's deposit account if his or her separation from the employ of the division occurs after five (5) years from the date he or she last became a member of the system.

If his or her separation from the employ of the division occurs within a period of five (5) years from and after the date he or she last became a member of the system, he or she shall be paid upon his or her written application filed with the board his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account less the total interest credited to his or her individual account therein.

In the event a member dies and does not leave a beneficiary entitled to a pension payable from funds of the system, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her death shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If there is no designated person surviving the member, his or her accumulated contributions shall be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Arkansas.

The payments may be made directly to a curator, guardian, administrator, or executor authorized to receive such payments wherever the representative may be with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

Refunds of a member's contributions or accumulated contributions, as the case may be, may be made in equal installments according to the rules that the board may adopt from time to time.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2879.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

24-6-413. Benefit provisions — Subjection of annuity rights to process of law.

The right of a person to an annuity, to the return of accumulated contributions, the annuity itself, any annuity option, any other right accrued or accruing under the provisions of this subchapter, and all moneys belonging to a plan shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever and shall be unassignable, except as is specifically provided in this chapter.

An employer shall have the right of setoff for any claim arising from embezzlement by or fraud of a member, retirant, or beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.

24-6-414. Maximum benefit limitation.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, benefits paid under the provisions of this chapter shall not exceed the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415 that are applicable to governmental retirement plans.

The Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System is hereby empowered and authorized to promulgate all necessary rules to implement the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415.

The rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section shall be amended to reflect any changes in the content or application of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415 enacted by the United States Congress or promulgated by the Internal Revenue Service.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2880.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).

24-6-415. Exclusion from plan.

Members of the State Police Retirement System participating in the benefit program provided by this subchapter shall not be eligible for participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Deferred Option Plan provided in § 24-6-301 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.

Subchapter 5
— Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, §
1, provided: “Legislative history, findings, and intent.

“(a) It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years. The State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years, and so needs a larger investment pool to help reduce risk and enhance returns. The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System.

“(b) This act represents a negotiated alternative to a proposal that would have eliminated the State Police Retirement System and would have made it a division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

“(c) This act maintains the autonomy over State Police Retirement System benefits but ensures funds are invested in a larger, more diversified pool of assets.

“(d) It is contemplated that at such time as the State Police Retirement System attains a funding level in which assets are eighty percent (80%) or more of actuarially accrued liabilities, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System may consider certain enhancements to the Tier II Deferred Retirement Option Plan.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, §
6: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years; that the State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years; that a larger investment pool is needed to help reduce risk and enhance returns; that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the members and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

24-6-501. Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan — Creation.

The Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan is created in conformance with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, §
4.

24-6-502. Election to participate in Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan.

In lieu of terminating employment and accepting a service retirement pension, a state police officer may elect to participate in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan and defer the receipt of benefits in accordance with this subchapter if:

The state police officer:

Is a member of the State Police Retirement System's Tier Two Benefit Plan under § 24-6-401 et seq.;

Has at least thirty (30) years of actual service as a member of the State Police Retirement System's Tier Two Benefit Plan under § 24-6-401 et seq.; and

Is eligible to receive a service retirement pension; and

The Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System approves the participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.

24-6-503. Limitation on credited service — Definition.

For purposes of this subchapter, “actual service” includes:

The service credit a member earns after April 3, 1997, as a member of the State Police Retirement System's Tier Two Benefit Plan under § 24-6-401 et seq.; and

The member's service credit from any reciprocal retirement system under § 24-2-401.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.

24-6-504. Employer contributions.

When an employee who is a member of the State Police Retirement System's Tier Two Benefit Plan begins participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan:

The employer contributions shall continue to be paid;

State contributions for the employee shall be credited to the State Police Retirement System; and

Seventy-two percent (72%) of the monthly retirement benefits that would have been payable had the employee elected to cease employment and receive a service retirement shall be paid into the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan account.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.

24-6-505. Benefits — Rate of return.

A participant in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan:

Shall not have a change in his or her monthly retirement benefit unless the plan receives a benefit increase; and

Shall earn interest at a rate set by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System that shall not be greater than five percent (5%) nor less than one percent (1%) per annum as determined by the board from time to time as promulgated by rule.

The interest shall be credited to the individual plan account balance of the participant on an annual basis.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.

24-6-506. Method of collection.

A participant in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall receive, at the option of the participant:

A lump-sum payment from the plan account equal to the payments to the plan account;

A true annuity based upon the plan account of the participant; or

Any other method of payment if approved by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.